South Dakota, session 2026, SB166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 7-8-14 be AMENDED:
7-8-14. The board of county commissioners shall meet and hold sessions, as open
meetings in accordance with chapter 1-25, for the transaction of business at the
courthouse, or at any other suitable location in the county, on at least a quarterly basis in
January, April, July, and October of each year.
Any meeting other than a special meeting:
(1) May not begin earlier than 6:00 p.m., if held on a weekday; or
(2) Must be recorded, with the recording made available for free on a publicly
accessible platform within twenty-four hours of the meeting.
The board may hold as many regular meetings throughout the year as necessary
to transact business.
The county auditor or the chair of the board of county commissioners may call a
special sessions if meeting, if necessitated by the interests of the county demand it, by
giving notice of the special session meeting to each county commissioner and the public
in accordance with § 1-25-1.1.
Section 2. That § 11-2-3.1 be AMENDED:
11-2-3.1. The planning commission shall meet at such times as may be once every
three months, or more frequently as necessary, to accomplish the purposes of this
chapter, but, in no event, shall the commission meet less than once every three months.
A meeting of the commission:
(1) May not begin earlier than 6:00 p.m., if held on a weekday; or
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.301.23 2 166
(2) Must be recorded, with the recording made available for free on a publicly
accessible platform within twenty-four hours of the meeting.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.